Illinois, session 104th, HB271.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Right to Breastfeed Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (740 ILCS 137/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Right 8to Breastfeed Act.9(Source: P.A. 93-942, eff. 8-16-04.)